Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2421
Projects other than power projects; sections applicable.

If the agency does not intend to engage in the operation of power projects or the generation or supply of electric energy, sections 18-2422 to 18-2425 shall apply.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 21.